src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-v_v43_odd_polata-dial_Por_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - pölätä - ok : # Verb 'to bring' - ok
     pölätä+V+Inf: pölätä
     pölätä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pölkkään
     pölätä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: pölkkäät
     pölätä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pölkkää
     pölätä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: pölkkäämä
     pölätä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: pölkkäättä
     pölätä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: pöläthään
     pölätä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: pölkäsin
     pölätä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: pölkäsit
     pölätä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [pölkäs, pölkäsi]
     pölätä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: pölkäsimmä
     pölätä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: pölkäsittä
     pölätä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: pöläthiin
     pölätä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: pöläny
     pölätä+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: pölätty
     pölätä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: pölänheet
     pölätä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: pölkkäävä
     pölätä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: pölkkäävät
     pölätä+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: pölättävä
     pölätä+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: pölättävät

     pölätä+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: pölkkäisin
     pölätä+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: pölkkäisit
     pölätä+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: pölkkäis
     pölätä+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: pölkkäisimmä
     pölätä+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: pölkkäisittä
     pölätä+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: pölättäis
     pölätä+V+Pass+Cond: pölättäis

     pölätä+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: pölkkää
     pölätä+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: pöläkkää

     pölätä+V+Act+Inf3+Ine: pölkkäämässä
     pölätä+V+Act+Inf3+Ela: pölkkäämästä
     pölätä+V+Act+Inf3+Ill: pölkkäämhään
     pölätä+V+Act+Inf3+Ade: pölkkäämällä
     pölätä+V+Act+Inf3+Abe: pölkkäämättä
